California, session 20252026, AB2143.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 1.9 (commencing with Section 7290) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 4 of Division 4 of the Food and Agricultural Code, to read: Article 1.9. Noxious Weeds Online Marketplaces7290. For purposes of this article, both all of the following definitions apply:(a) “Online marketplace” means an electronically accessed platform that includes features that allow for, facilitate, or enable facilitate a third-party seller to engage in any part of a transaction, including the sale, purchase, payment, storage, shipping, or delivery into this state of a product. of a product for delivery into this state.(b) “Reasonable controls” means reasonable procedures, acts, or practices that are designed and implemented to do all of the following:(1) Prevent the acceptance of payment for a noxious weed listed for delivery to an address in the state, including, but not limited to, a noxious weed listed for sale by its scientific name, common name, or a publicly known variation of either.(2) Maintain a process to identify and address mislabeling or deceptive marketing of a plant for the purpose of avoiding detection of a noxious weed.(3) Identify and restrict a third-party seller whose listings for noxious weeds are repeatedly successfully processed on the online marketplace despite the reasonable controls.(b)(c) “Third-party seller” means a person or entity, independent of an online marketplace, who sells, offers to sell, or contracts with an online marketplace to sell or ship a product in the for delivery into this state using an online marketplace.7291. (a) An online marketplace shall not accept payment for the purchase facilitate the sale or shipment of a noxious weed for delivery to an address located in the state.(b) If an employee of the department acting within the course and scope of their regular duties and using existing resources identifies a shipment of a noxious weed and determines that the shipment originated from, or occurred through a transaction conducted through, an online marketplace in violation of subdivision (a), the secretary may provide written notice to the online marketplace that it may be subject to an administrative penalty for that violation that includes, to the extent feasible, all of the following information:(1) The identity of the third-party seller.(2) The product listing.(3) The noxious weed identified in the shipment.(c) (1) The secretary may levy an administrative penalty against the online marketplace for a violation of subdivision (a), except as provided in subdivision (e), if both of the following occur:(A) The online marketplace received written notice pursuant to subdivision (b).(B) An employee of the department acting within the course and scope of their regular duties and using existing resources identifies a shipment of a noxious weed and determines that the shipment originated from, or occurred through a transaction conducted through, an online marketplace in violation of subdivision (a) following the online marketplace receiving any written notice pursuant to subdivision (b).(2) If the secretary levies an administrative penalty pursuant to paragraph (1), the administrative penalty shall be as follows:(A) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for the first violation after written notice pursuant to subdivision (b).(B) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for a second violation.(C) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for a third or subsequent violation.(d) The secretary may levy a separate administrative penalty against the online marketplace, in addition to any other administrative penalty levied pursuant to subdivision (c), in an amount equal to the reasonable costs associated with remediating damage caused by a violation of subdivision (a).(e) An online marketplace shall not be subject to an administrative penalty pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) if the online marketplace demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that it has implemented, and maintains, reasonable controls.(f) The revenues from an administrative penalty levied pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to, upon appropriation by the Legislature, cover costs related to the enforcement of this division.(g) Notwithstanding any other law, an online marketplace subject to an administrative penalty pursuant to this section shall only be subject to the administrative penalties described in this section.(b)(1)This section shall be enforced by the secretary.(2)In lieu of prosecution, the secretary may levy an administrative penalty against any online marketplace that violates this section as follows:(A)Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a first violation.(B)Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for a second violation.(C)Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for a third or subsequent violation.(3)In addition to any penalties collected pursuant to paragraph (2), the secretary may seek all reasonable costs associated with remediating damage caused by violations of this section.(4)All moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Noxious Weed Management Account.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.